Tennessee, session 114, SB0232.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-7-111, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(e) A county election commission may designate restroom facilities in a building
in which the election is to be held that are for the use of workers or volunteers working
for a campaign. Workers and volunteers of a campaign working outside of a polling
place may use restroom facilities in the building in which the election is held that have
been designated for use by workers or volunteers working for a campaign, but shall not
enter the polling place. A worker or volunteer of a campaign shall cover or remove
clothing or accoutrements bearing campaign material before entering the boundary
designated under subsection (a). A worker or volunteer of a campaign who enters the
boundary without covering or removing campaign material, or who attempts to solicit
votes within the boundary, may be subject to punishment under § 2-19-119.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0232
000633
- 1 -